Utah statutes.
4-30-2.   Livestock Market Committee created -- Composition -- Terms -- Removal -- Compensation -- Duties.

(1)  There is created a Livestock Market Committee which consists of the following seven members appointed to a four-year term of office by the commissioner:

(a)  one member recommended by the livestock market operators in the state;

(b)  one member recommended by the Utah Cattlemen's Association;

(c)  one member recommended by the Utah Dairymen's Association;

(d)  one member recommended by the Utah Woolgrowers' Association;

(e)  one member recommended by the horse industry;

(f)  one member recommended by the Utah Farm Bureau Federation; and

(g)  one member recommended by the Utah Farmers Union.

(2)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (1), the commissioner shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to ensure that the terms of committee members are staggered so that approximately half of the committee is appointed every two years.

(3)  No more than four members shall be members of the same political party.

(4) (a)  The commissioner may remove a member of the committee at the request of the association or group which recommended the member's appointment.

(b)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term.

(5)  The Livestock Market Committee shall elect a chair from its membership, who shall serve for a term of office of two years, but may be reelected for subsequent terms.

(6) (a)  The chair is responsible for the call and conduct of meetings.

(b)  Four members constitute a quorum for the transaction of official business.

(7)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

(8)  The Livestock Market Committee acts as advisor to the department with respect to the administration and enforcement of this chapter and makes recommendations necessary to carry out the intent of this chapter to the commissioner.

